en: Handheld Metal Shears & Nibblers
xx: Handheld Metal Shears & Nibblers
cs: Nůžky na plech a prostřihovače
da: Håndholdte metalskærere og -hultænger
de: Metallscheren & Nibbelmaschinen
es: Cizalladoras y recortadoras de chapa con asidero
fr: Cisailles et grignoteuses à main
it: Cesoie e roditrici manuali per metalli
ja: ニブラー
nl: Metaal- en knabbelscharen
no: Håndholdte metallsakser og metallskjæreverktøy
pl: Ręczne przecinaki do metalu
pt: Cisalhadores
ru: Ручные ножницы и вырубные машины по металлу
sv: Plåtsaxar och nibblare
tr: El Tipi Metal Makasları ve Dişleyiciler

en: Nippers
xx: Nippers
cs: Štípačky
da: Klosakse
de: Zwickzangen
es: Tenazas
fr: Tenailles, Tenaille
it: Pinze nipper
ja: ニッパー
nl: Nijptangen
no: Knipetenger
pl: Obcęgi
pt: Tenazes
ru: Бокорезы
sv: Kniptänger
tr: Penseler

en: Pipe Cutters
xx: Pipe Cutters
cs: Řezačky trubek
da: Rørskærere
de: Rohrschneider
es: Cortatubos
fr: Coupe-tubes
it: Tagliatubi
ja: パイプカッター
nl: Pijpensnijders
no: Rørkuttere
pl: Przecinaki do rur
pt: Cortador de tubos
ru: Труборезы
sv: Rörskärare
tr: Boru Kesiciler

en: Rebar Cutters
xx: Rebar Cutters
cs: Stříhačky betonářské oceli
da: Armeringsstangklipper
de: Betonstahlschneider
es: Cortadoras de varilla
fr: Coupe-barre
it: Cesoie per tondini
ja: 鉄筋カッター
nl: Betonscharen
no: Armeringsskjærere
pl: Przecinaki do prętów zbrojeniowych
pt: Cortadores de rebarbas
ru: Пруткорезы
sv: Kapare till armeringsjärn
tr: Betonarme Demiri Kesiciler

en: Tile & Shingle Cutters
xx: Tile & Shingle Cutters
cs: Řezačky na obklady a střešní krytiny
da: Flise- og tagspånskærer
de: Fliesen-\, Ziegel- & Schindelschneider
es: Cortatejas/cortadoras de azulejos
fr: Coupe-carreaux et bardeaux
it: Tagliapiastrelle e scandole
ja: タイル・屋根板用カッター
nl: Tegelsnijders
no: Flis- og skiferskjærere
pl: Przecinaki do kafelków i gontów
pt: Cortadores de azulejos e telhas
ru: Станки для резки плитки и черепицы
sv: Kakelskärare
tr: Tuğla ve Kiremit Kesiciler

en: Utility Knives
xx: Utility Knives
cs: Odlamovací nože
da: Hobbyknive
de: Cutter
es: Cúters
fr: Cutters, Cutter
it: Coltelli multiuso
ja: カッターナイフ
nl: Hobbymessen
no: Brukskniver
pl: Noże introligatorskie
pt: Facas utilitárias
ru: Универсальные ножи
sv: Mattknivar
tr: Çok Amaçlı Bıçaklar

en: Pocket Knives
xx: Pocket Knives
fr: Canifs, Canif

en: Hand Files & Rasps
xx: Hand Files & Rasps
fr: Limes et râpes, Lime (outil de bricolage), Râpe (outil de bricolage)

en: Deburrers
xx: Deburrers
cs: Odstraňovače otřepů
da: Afgratere
de: Entgrater
es: Desbarbadores
fr: Outils d'ébavurage
it: Sbavatori
ja: バリ取り機
nl: Ontbramers
no: Spissforsenkere
pl: Gratowniki
pt: Máquinas de rebarbar
ru: Инструменты для снятия заусенцев
sv: Gradningsverktyg
tr: Çapak Alıcılar

en: Dollies & Hand Trucks
xx: Dollies & Hand Trucks
cs: Rudly a manipulační vozíky
da: Sækkevogne og pakkevogne
de: Rollwagen & Sackkarren
es: Carretillas de carga
fr: Diables et chariots de manutention
it: Carrelli merci
ja: 台車・手押し車
nl: Rijdende plateaus en handkarren
no: Vogner og traller
pl: Wózki ręczne
pt: Carros e carrinhos de mão
ru: Ручные тележки
sv: Dollies och vagnar
tr: Kaydırma Arabaları ve El Arabaları

en: Drills
xx: Drills
cs: Vrtačky
da: Bor
de: Bohrmaschinen
es: Taladros
fr: Perceuses, Perceuse électrique
it: Trapani
ja: ドリル
nl: Boren
no: Driller
pl: Wiertarki
pt: Furadeiras
ru: Дрели
sv: Borrmaskiner
tr: Matkaplar

en: Augers
xx: Augers
cs: Nebozezy
da: Sneglebor
de: Schneckenbohrer
es: Barrenas helicoidales
fr: Tarières, Tarière thermique
it: Trivelle
ja: オーガー
nl: Opzetstukken grondboren
no: Vribor
pl: Przenośniki śrubowe
pt: Parafusos sem-fim
ru: Буры
sv: Navare
tr: Burgular

en: Drill Presses
xx: Drill Presses
cs: Stojanové vrtačky
da: Boremaskiner
de: Ständerbohrmaschinen
es: Taladradora de columna
fr: Perceuses à colonne
it: Trapani a colonna
ja: ボール盤
nl: Kolomboormachines
no: Benkdriller
pl: Wiertarki pionowe
pt: Furadeiras mecânicas
ru: Сверлильные станки
sv: Borrpressar
tr: Tezgah Üstü Matkaplar

en: Handheld Power Drills
xx: Handheld Power Drills
cs: Ruční vrtačky
da: Håndholdte elektriske boremaskiner
de: Elektrische Handbohrmaschinen
es: Taladros eléctricos de mano
fr: Perceuses électriques portatives
it: Trapani portatili
ja: 電動ドリル
nl: Handboormachines
no: Håndholdte elektriske driller
pl: Wiertarki przenośne
pt: Furadeiras elétricas portáteis
ru: Ручные электрические дрели
sv: Handborrmaskiner
tr: Elektrikli El Matkapları

en: Mortisers
xx: Mortisers
cs: Dlabačky
da: Notskæremaskiner
de: Stemmmaschinen
es: Mortajadoras
fr: Mortaiseuses
it: Cavatrici
ja: モータイザー
nl: Gatenfrezen
no: Tapphullmaskiner
pl: Dłutownice
pt: Máquinas de entalhador de madeira
ru: Долбежные станки
sv: Fyrkantborrar
tr: Zıvana Delik Makineleri

en: Pneumatic Drills
xx: Pneumatic Drills
cs: Pneumatické vrtačky
da: Trykluftsbor
de: Druckluftbohrer
es: Taladros neumáticos
fr: Perceuses pneumatiques
it: Trapani pneumatici
ja: エアドリル
nl: Pneumatische boren
no: Trykkluftsdriller
pl: Wiertarki pneumatyczne
pt: Furadeiras pneumáticas
ru: Пневматические дрели
sv: Pneumatiska borrmaskiner
tr: Pnömatik Matkaplar

en: Electrician Fish Tape
xx: Electrician Fish Tape
cs: Elektrikářské protahovací pero
da: Elektrikerens fangsnor
de: Einziehhilfen
es: Guía pasacables
fr: Tire-fils
it: Fish tape per elettricisti
ja: フィッシュテープ
nl: Trekveer voor elektricien
no: Trekkebånd
pl: Taśma perlonowa
pt: Fitas pescadoras
ru: Протяжная проволока для электриков
sv: Dragfjädrar
tr: Elektrikçi Kılavuz Telleri

en: Flashlights & Headlamps
xx: Flashlights & Headlamps
cs: Svítilny a čelovky
da: Lygter
de: Taschenlampen & Stirnlampen
es: Linternas
fr: Lampes de poche et lampes frontales
it: Torce tascabili e da testa
ja: 懐中電灯・ヘッドランプ
nl: Zaklantaarns en hoofdlampen
no: Lommelykter og hodelykter
pl: Latarki
pt: Lanternas e lanternas de cabeça
ru: Фонари
sv: Signallampor
tr: El ve Kafa Fenerleri

en: Flashlights
xx: Flashlights
cs: Kapesní svítilny
da: Lommelygter
de: Taschenlampen
es: Linterna
fr: Lampes de poche, Lampes torches, Lampe torche
it: Torce tascabili
ja: 懐中電灯
nl: Zaklantaarns
no: Lommelykter
pl: Latarki tradycyjne
pt: Lanternas
ru: Фонарики
sv: Ficklampa
tr: El Fenerleri

en: Headlamps
xx: Headlamps
cs: Čelovky
da: Pandelamper
de: Stirnlampen
es: Linternas para la cabeza
fr: Lampes frontales
it: Lampade frontali
ja: ヘッドランプ
nl: Hoofdlampen
no: Hodelykter
pl: Latarka czołowa
pt: Lanternas de cabeça
ru: Налобные фонари
sv: Pannlampor
tr: Kafa Lambaları